Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Chapter 22
MONEY OF ACCOUNT AND INTEREST

Sec.

§ 28-22-101 — 28-22-103. Money of account — Money of other denominations — Computation of judgments. [Repealed.]

§ 28-22-104. Legal rate of interest.

Money due by express contract.

Money after the same becomes due.

Money lent.

Money received to the use of another and retained beyond a reasonable time without the owner’s consent, express or implied.

Money due on the settlement of mutual accounts from the date the balance is ascertained.

Money due upon open accounts after three (3) months from the date of the last item.

History.

1879, p. 7, § 4; R.S., § 1263; am. 1897, p. 95, § 1; reen. 1899, p. 315, § 1; reen. R.C. & C.L., § 1537; C.S., § 2551; I.C.A.,§ 26-1904; am. 1933, ch. 197, § 1, p. 390; am. 1974, ch. 229, § 1, p. 1586; am. 1981, ch. 157, § 1, p. 269; am. 1987, ch. 278, § 7, p. 571; am. 1995, ch. 304, § 1, p. 1053; am. 1996, ch. 94, § 1, p. 279.

Section 18 of S.L. 1987, ch. 278 read: “The provisions of this act shall take effect on July 1, 1987, provided however, that Section [Sections] 1 through 11 shall apply only to causes of action which accrue on and after July 1, 1987.”
CASE NOTES

Contracts.

— — Tort claims.

Res judicata.

§ 28-22-105. Checks dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment — Liability for interest — Collection costs and attorney’s fees.

Whenever a check, as defined in section 28-3-104, Idaho Code, has been dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment and has not been paid within fifteen (15) days and after the holder of such check sends such notice of dishonor as provided in section 28-22-106, Idaho Code, to the drawer, then if the check does not provide for the payment of interest, or collection costs and attorney’s fees, the drawer of such check shall also be liable for payment of interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum from the date of dishonor and cost of collection not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) or the face amount of the check, whichever is the lesser; provided however, that if the holder of the dishonored check has the right to collect a set fee under a written agreement or has notified the drawer by a posted notice at the point of sale that the drawer will be required to pay a set collection fee if the check is dishonored, the holder is not required to give the notice of dishonor as provided in section 28-22-106, Idaho Code, and may assess a collection cost of the notice amount regardless of the size of the check, but the set fee may not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00). In addition, in the event of court action on the check, the court, after such notice and the expiration of said fifteen (15) days, shall award reasonable attorney’s fees as part of the damages payable to the holder of the check. No attorney’s fees may be awarded to a collection agency in a proceeding pursuant to section 1-2301A, Idaho Code. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any check which has been dishonored by reason of any justifiable stop payment order.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-22-105, as added by 1994, ch. 185, § 1, p. 603; am. 1996, ch. 373, § 5, p. 1269; am. 2002, ch. 288, § 2, p. 833.

§ 28-22-106. Statutory form for notice of dishonor.

The notice of dishonor shall be sent either:

By certified mail to the drawer at his last known address, or

By regular mail, supported by an affidavit of service by mailing, to the address printed or written on the check.

The affidavit of service by mailing shall be retained by the payee or holder of the check.

Notice shall be deemed conclusive three (3) days following the date the affidavit is executed.

The affidavit of service shall be substantially in the following form:

The notice of dishonor shall be substantially in the following form:

STATE OF ) AFFIDAVIT OF SERVICE

) BY MAIL

COUNTY OF )

............, being first duly sworn on oath, deposes and states that he/she is of legal age and that on (date) ......, ....., he/she served the attached Notice of Dishonor, by placing a true and correct copy thereof securely enclosed in an envelope addressed as follows:

..................................................

..................................................

..................................................

..................................................

and deposited the same, with postage prepaid, in the United States mail at ...................., .....................

...............................

(Signature)

Subscribed and sworn to before me this .... day of ......, ....

...............

Notary Public

........ County, ........

(SEAL)

§ 28-22-107. Consequences for failing to comply with requirements.

No interest, collection costs and attorney’s fees shall be recovered on any dishonored check under the provisions of section 28-22-105, Idaho Code, where the holder of such check or any agent, employee or assignee of the holder has demanded:

Interest or collection costs in excess of that provided in section 28-22-105, Idaho Code; or

Interest or collection costs prior to the expiration of fifteen (15) days after the mailing of notice of dishonor, as provided in sections 28-22-105 and 28-22-106, Idaho Code; or

Attorney’s fees, either without having such fees set by the court, or prior to the expiration of fifteen (15) days after the mailing of notice of dishonor, as provided in sections 28-22-105 and 28-22-106, Idaho Code.

The provisions of this section shall not prohibit the collection of a set collection fee which does not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00), if the holder has the right to collect a set fee under a written agreement or has notified the drawer at the point of sale that the drawer will be required to pay the set collection fee in the event a check is dishonored.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-22-107, as added by 1994, ch. 185, § 3, p. 603; am. 1996, ch. 373, § 6, p. 1269; am. 2002, ch. 288, § 4, p. 833.

§ 28-22-108 — 28-22-112. Interest — Usury. [Repealed.]